District of Columbia statutes.
3-204

Bond furnished by school receiving bodies.

No school except the medical schools of the United States Army, Air Force, and Navy shall receive any body under the provisions of this chapter until said school has given bond to the District of Columbia, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia has approved such bond, which said bond shall be in the penal sum of $200 and conditioned that all bodies which said school shall receive shall be used in said District and only for the promotion of the medical, dental, or mortuary sciences.

Apr. 29, 1902, 32 Stat. 174, ch. 638, § 4
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-199,§ 8(b), 30 DCR 119

History

1981 Ed., § 2-1404.
1973 Ed., § 2-204.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government